Utah statutes.
53-8-203.   Council created -- Members -- Term -- Meetings -- Duties.
(1)   There is created within the division the Motor Vehicle Safety Inspection
Advisory Council.
(2) (a)  The council shall be composed of seven members.
(b)  The governor shall appoint:
(i)  one member from the general public with experience or interest in product
safety or consumer advocacy;
(ii)  two representatives from motor vehicle mechanics and motor vehicle
repair business owners;
(iii)  one member of the motoring public with no former or current affiliation
with the motor vehicle sales, repair, or fuel industry or its regulation;
(iv)  one peace officer with experience in motor vehicle law enforcement;
(v)  one representative of the commercial trucking industry; and
(vi)  one representative of the staff of the attorney general who shall serve
without voting privileges.
(3)  Each member of the council shall:
(a)  be selected on a nonpartisan basis;
(b)  be appointed by the governor; and
(c)  have been a legal resident of the state for at least one year immediately
preceding the date of appointment.
(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b), as terms of current council
members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed
member to a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that
approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.
(c)  Members serve from the date of appointment until a replacement is
appointed.
(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(6)  The council shall elect its own chair and vice-chair at its first regular
meeting each calendar year.
(7)  All meetings of the council shall be called by the superintendent of the
highway patrol as needed.
(8)  Any three voting members constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business that comes before the council.
(9) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member’s official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the council at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
(10)  The council shall:
(a)  hear appeals of administrative actions regarding the suspension or
revocation of safety inspection station permits and safety inspector
certificates;
(b)  advise the division on interpretation, adoption, and implementation of
motor vehicle safety inspection standards; and
(c)  advise the division on other motor vehicle safety inspection issues as
requested by the superintendent.
(11)  In conducting appeal hearings on the suspension or revocation of any
safety inspection station permit or safety inspector certificate the council
may:
(a)  compel the attendance of witnesses by subpoena;
(b)  require the production of any records or documents determined by it to be
pertinent to the subject matter of the hearing; and
(c)  apply to the district court of the county where the hearing is held for
an order citing any applicant or witness for contempt and for failure to
attend, testify, or produce required documents.
